Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3001
Decedent's estate; all or any part to state; notice to Attorney General.

Whenever, upon the filing of a petition for probate or administration or thereafter in the administration of any estate, it shall appear that all or any part of the estate is bequeathed or devised or will escheat to the State of Nebraska, the county judge shall, before the appointment of a personal representative, notify the Attorney General of Nebraska by mail of the pendency of such administration and of the probable interests of the state.

Laws 1978, LB 863, § 1.